Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-1005
Civil action authorized.

Any prisoner or detainee restrained in violation of the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act may file a civil action which shall be pursued as a tort claim under the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act or the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 5.

Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, see section 13-901.

State Tort Claims Act, see section 81-8,235.